Nebraska, session 109, LB460.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB460 LB460
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) The Nebraska Council on Economic Education Cash Fund
is created. The fund shall consist of funds transferred by the
Legislature. The fund shall be used by the Board of Regents of the
University of Nebraska for expenses related to the Nebraska Council on
Economic Education within the University of Nebraska. Any money in the
fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate three hundred
thousand dollars from the Nebraska Council on Economic Education Cash
Fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska for fiscal
year 2025-26. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate three
hundred thousand dollars from the Nebraska Council on Economic Education
Cash Fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska for
fiscal year 2026-27.
Sec. 2. Section 59-1608.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
59-1608.04 (1) The State Settlement Cash Fund is created. The fund
shall be maintained by the Department of Justice and administered by the
Attorney General. Except as otherwise provided by law, the fund shall
consist of all recoveries received pursuant to the Consumer Protection
Act, including any money, funds, securities, or other things of value in
the nature of civil damages or other payment, except criminal penalties,
whether such recovery is by way of verdict, judgment, compromise, or
settlement in or out of court, or other final disposition of any case or
controversy, or any other payments received on behalf of the state by the
Department of Justice and administered by the Attorney General for the
benefit of the state or the general welfare of its citizens, but
excluding all funds held in a trust capacity where specific benefits
accrue to specific individuals, organizations, or governments. The fund
may be expended for any allowable legal purposes as determined by the
-2-

LB460 LB460
2025 2025
Attorney General. Transfers from the State Settlement Cash Fund may be
made at the direction of the Legislature to the Nebraska Capital
Construction Fund, the Legal Education for Public Service and Rural
Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund, the Nebraska State Patrol Cash
Fund, the Financial Literacy Cash Fund, and the General Fund. To provide
necessary financial accountability and management oversight, revenue from
individual settlement agreements or other separate sources credited to
the State Settlement Cash Fund may be tracked and accounted for within
the state accounting system through the use of separate and distinct
funds, subfunds, or any other available accounting mechanism specifically
approved by the Accounting Administrator for use by the Department of
Justice. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning
October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the
fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million five hundred
thousand dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Nebraska
Capital Construction Fund on July 1, 2013, or as soon thereafter as
administratively possible.
(3) The State Treasurer shall transfer eight hundred seventy-six
thousand nine hundred ninety-eight dollars from the State Settlement Cash
Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2018, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer one million seven hundred
fifty-six thousand six hundred thirty-nine dollars from the State
Settlement Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2019, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(5) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred twenty-five
-3-

LB460 LB460
2025 2025
thousand dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Legal
Education for Public Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance
Fund on or before April 30, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(6) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Legal Education for
Public Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund on or
before July 9, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(7) The State Treasurer shall transfer six hundred thousand dollars
from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Nebraska Council on Economic
Education Cash Fund on or before July 1, 2025, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
Sec. 3. Original section 59-1608.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-